Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Chapter 11. Uniform Limited Partnership Act.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 78, SLA 1997 amended AS

32.11.010

,

32.11.260

,

32.11.370

,

32.11.380

,

32.11.800

, and

32.11.990

; and added AS

32.11.095

and

32.11.835

. Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For provisions of AS 32.11 in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.